Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-45] Surface water criteria for
designation. In designating an area for water use regulation, the
commission shall consider the following:

(1) Whether regulation is necessary to preserve the
diminishing surface water supply for future needs, as evidenced by excessively
declining surface water levels, not related to rainfall variations, or
increasing or proposed diversions of surface waters to levels which may
detrimentally affect existing instream uses or prior existing off stream uses;

(2) Whether the diversions of stream waters are
reducing the capacity of the stream to assimilate pollutants to an extent which
adversely affects public health or existing instream uses; or

(3) Serious disputes respecting the use of surface
water resources are occurring. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2]

Case Notes

Commission did not
err in regulating the Waiahole Ditch infrastructure as a unified system as
independent designation of water management areas does not preclude
consolidated regulation where a water delivery system draws water from several
different water management areas and the consolidated regulation of a single
diversion works comports entirely with the commission's function of
comprehensive water planning and management. 94 H. 97, 9 P.3d 409.

Given the undisputed
direct interrelationship between the surface and ground waters in the Waiahole
Ditch case, the designation of Windward Oahu as a ground water management area
subjects both ground and surface water diversions from the designated area to
the statutory permit requirement. 94 H. 97, 9 P.3d 409.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next